New Jersey, session 222, A2697.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a. As used in this section, nursing home means a nursing home licensed pursuant to P.L.1971 c.136 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.) b. No nursing home shall restrict any patient from obtaining prescription drugs through a prescription drug program or health plan offered by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.  If a nursing home patient obtains prescription drugs through a prescription drug program or health plan offered by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs, the nursing home may require the prescription drugs to be dispensed and administered according to the facility's policies. 2. This act shall take effect immediately.